Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-730
Communications between tribunals.

A tribunal of this state may communicate with a tribunal outside this state in a record or by telephone, electronic mail, or other means to obtain information concerning the laws, the legal effect of a judgment, decree, or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding. A tribunal of this state may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal outside this state.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 30;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 68;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 25.